apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON Misc_Pronouns
!се%<dem%>:се vese-QNT ;
!секе%<dem%>%<pron%>:секе vese-QNT ; ! This also allows plural
!сете%<dem%>%<pron%>:сете te-Dem ;
!те%<dem%>:те te-Dem ;
!тевате%<dem%>:тевате te-Dem ;

севате%<dem%>%<pron%>:севате te-Dem ;
тете%<dem%>:тете te-Dem ;
!
те%<dem%>%<pron%>%<cx_gen%>%<cx_abl%>:тенде K ;
те%<dem%>%<pron%>%<cx_gen%>%<cx_abe%>%<dial%>:тенстеме K ;
!
!истямо%<dep%>:истям Misc_Pronouns1 ;
кона%<pron%>:кона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
коната%<pron%>:коната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
нона%<dem%>%<pron%>:нона Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
тона%<dem%>%<pron%>:тона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
тоната%<dem%>%<pron%>:тоната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
! мезе%<pron%>:мезИ2 Misc_Pronouns1 ;
! мезе%<pron%>%<indef%>%<cx_gen%>:мень K ;
! ки%<pron%>%<interr%>:ки Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!не%<dem%>:не ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!неке%<dem%>%<pron%>:неке ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!нете%<dem%>%<pron%>:нете Misc_Pronouns1 ;




! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !



!! Some pronoun continuation have been moved here
!! Out of TestLexc-noun.txt

LEXICON Misc_Pronouns1
 Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
 Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
%<dep%>: WORD-END ;
 PossPX1-NomSg ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen
%<cx_gen%>: PossPX1 ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen

LEXICON te-Dem
%<pron%>: _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
%<dep%>: WORD-END ;

!Formerly ne-Misc_Pronouns1
LEXICON ne-Dem
%<dem%>%<pron%>: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
%<dem%>%<dep%>: WORD-END ;


LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Sg
  Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>сь  _ОШ-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>нть K ;
%<sg%>%<def%>%<cx_dat%>:%>нтень K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_prl%>%<def%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_abe%>%<def%>:%>втО1мО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_abl%>%<def%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>кс _ОШ-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>шка _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>V1кс _ОШ-SgDet-PossPx ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Sg
  _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
%<sg%>%<def%>%<cx_nom%>:%>сь  _ОШ-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
%<sg%>%<def%>%<cx_gen%>:%>нть K ;
%<sg%>%<def%>%<cx_dat%>:%>нтень K ;
%<sg%>%<cx_prl%>%<def%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_abe%>%<def%>:%>втО1мО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_abl%>%<def%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>кс _ОШ-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>шка _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx ;
%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>кс _ОШ-SgDet-PossPx ;


LEXICON SgDet-PossPx
 PossPX1 ;
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _ОШ-SgDet-PossPx
 _ОШ-PossPX1 ;
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _КУДО-SgDet-PossPx
     %<pxsg1%>00@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>нЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg1@  _КАЛ-SecondaryDeclination ;
%<dial%>%<pxsg1%>@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>м@U.PossPx.Sg1@    _КАЛ-SecondaryDeclination ;
     %<pxsg2%>00@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>тЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@  _КИТ-SecondaryDeclination ;
%<dial%>%<pxsg2%>00@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>нтЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ _КИТ-SecondaryDeclination ;
     %<pxsg3%>000@U.PossPx.Sg3@:%>нзО1@U.PossPx.Sg3@ _КУДО-SecondaryDeclination ;
     %<pxpl1%>000@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>нО1к@U.PossPx.Pl1@ _ЛАК-SecondaryDeclination ;
     %<pxpl2%>00@U.PossPx.Pl2@:%>нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@   _ЛАК-SecondaryDeclination ;
     %<pxpl3%>00@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>ст@U.PossPx.Pl3@   _КИТ-SecondaryDeclination ;
%<dial%>%<pxpl3%>00@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@  _КИТ-SecondaryDeclination ;
                  %<sg%>%<def%>:%>нть  K ;

LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Indef
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<indef%>:  Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>нь _КАЛ-Tenses1 ; 
%<cx_dat%>%<indef%>:%>нень K ;
%<cx_ill%>%<indef%>:%>с K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>стэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ela%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>стэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ine%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>сэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ill%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>с K ; 
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_abe%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>втО1мО1 K ;
%<cx_ine%>%<indef%>:%>сО1 K ; 
%<cx_ela%>%<indef%>:%>стО1 K ;
%<cx_prl%>%<indef%>:%>Г2а K ;
%<cx_abe%>%<indef%>:%>втО1мО1 K ;
%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:%>ксЬ2 K ;
%<cx_cmp%>%<indef%>:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Indef
%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<indef%>:0  _КУДО-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>нь _КАЛ-Tenses1 ; 
%<cx_dat%>%<indef%>:%>нень K ;
%<cx_ill%>%<indef%>:%>с K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>стэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ela%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>стэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ine%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>сэ K ;
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_ill%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>с K ; 
%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>%<cx_abe%>%<indef%>:%>нь%>втО1мО1 K ;
%<cx_ine%>%<indef%>:%>сО1 K ; 
%<cx_ela%>%<indef%>:%>стО1 K ;
%<cx_prl%>%<indef%>:%>Г2а K ;
%<cx_abe%>%<indef%>:%>втО1мО1 K ;
%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:%>ксЬ2 K ; !!2013-04-15 What is this
%<cx_cmp%>%<indef%>:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Pl
%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<indef%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3 K ; 
%<pl%>%<cx_abl%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>де K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_abe%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>шка K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>нь K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>нень K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_ill%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>сэ K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>стэ K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>кс K ;
%<pl%>%<cx_prl%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>ва K ;

!! DEMONSTRATIVE DERIVATION !!
LEXICON N2Dem-SE
%<der_dem%>%<der_mwn%>:се _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;


!! PROPER NOUNS

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Male given name for deriving patronyms 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Андрей:Андре
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
%<use_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:й PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
%<use_colloq%>:ьич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
%<use_colloq%>:ьич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:иевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:иевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
%<use_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ь PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

!! Вили:Вил
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
%<use_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:и PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;


LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
%<use_colloq%>:ыч PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:овна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Russian type Surnames 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Абдеев:Абдеев
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL
: PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:а PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

!! Багрий:Багр
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ИЙ_SURMAL
:ий PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:яя PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

!! Аморский:Аморск
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-КИЙ_SURMAL
:ий PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ОЙ_SURMAL
:ой PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ЫЙ_SURMAL
:ый PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-АН_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ИН_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL ;


LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_mal%>: N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_mal%>: N_КАЛ-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_mal%>: _КАЛ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_mal%>: N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SURFEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_fem%>: N_КУДО-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_fem%>: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>%<sem_fem%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: N_КАЛ-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: N_КАЛ-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: _КАЛ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;


LEXICON CYRL-Т_SUR
 PROP_КИТ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-К_SUR
 PROP_ЛАК_SUR ;

LEXICON Nouns
неке:неке ne-Dem  "juuri ne" ;
